California, session 20252026, AB1985.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 67387 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 67386, to read:67387. (a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as Sarah Shulze’s Law.(b)On or before July 1, 2028, the California State University, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, and each private postsecondary educational institution and independent institution of higher education that receives state financial assistance shall, and the University of California is requested to, identify and compile a list of mental health training programs that can be used to train athletic coaches. All trainings shall, at a minimum, cover suicide prevention education. Trainings may also cover mental health first aid education if suicide prevention education is included.(c)(b) On or before July 1, 2028, and every two years thereafter, each campus of the California State University, each community college of a community college district, and each private postsecondary educational institution and independent institution of higher education that receives state financial assistance shall, and each campus of the University of California is requested to, require a person who serves as a coach coach, including an assistant coach, or trainer in an athletic program, as a condition of the person’s employment or volunteer service, to complete a student mental health training that has been identified pursuant to subdivision (b). that, at minimum, covers suicide prevention education. The student mental health training may cover mental health first aid education and may be provided by an entity that offers free, online, or other types of training courses.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.